Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 HOSPITAL CONSTRUCTION MORATORIUM REPEAL Section 1. new text begin HOSPITAL CONSTRUCTION MORATORIUM EXEMPTION CONTINUATION.new text end new text begin Any condition on which a hospital construction moratorium exemption was granted under Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.551, remains in effect. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.551, subdivisions 1, 1a, 2, 3, and 4, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end ARTICLE 2 CONFORMING CHANGES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.17, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. deleted text begin Hospital anddeleted text end Nursing home moratoria preserved; nursing homes exempt. Nothing in this section supersedes or limits the applicability of section deleted text begin 144.551 ordeleted text end 144A.071. This section does not apply to major spending commitments made by nursing homes or intermediate care facilities that are related to the provision of long-term care services to residents. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.55, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Routine inspections; presumption. Any hospital surveyed and accredited under the standards of the hospital accreditation program of an approved accrediting organization that submits to the commissioner within a reasonable time copies of (a) its currently valid accreditation certificate and accreditation letter, together with accompanying recommendations and comments and (b) any further recommendations, progress reports and correspondence directly related to the accreditation is presumed to comply with application requirements of subdivision 1 and the standards requirements of subdivision 3 and no further routine inspections or accreditation information shall be required by the commissioner to determine compliance. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 144.54 and 144.653, subdivisions 2 and 4, hospitals shall be inspected only as provided in this section. The provisions of section 144.653 relating to the assessment and collection of fines shall not apply to any hospital. The commissioner of health shall annually conduct, with notice, validation inspections of a selected sample of the number of hospitals accredited by an approved accrediting organization, not to exceed ten percent of accredited hospitals, for the purpose of determining compliance with the provisions of subdivision 3. If a validation survey discloses a failure to comply with subdivision 3, the provisions of section 144.653 relating to correction orders, reinspections, and notices of noncompliance shall apply. The commissioner shall also conduct any inspection necessary to determine whether hospital construction, addition, or remodeling projects comply with standards for construction promulgated in rules pursuant to subdivision 3. The commissioner may also conduct inspections to determine whether a hospital or hospital corporate system continues to satisfy the conditions on which a hospital construction moratorium exception was granted undernew text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024,new text end section 144.551, subdivision 1a. Pursuant to section 144.653, the commissioner shall inspect any hospital that does not have a currently valid hospital accreditation certificate from an approved accrediting organization. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the investigative powers of the Office of Health Facility Complaints as established in sections 144A.51 to 144A.54. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.55, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Suspension, revocation, and refusal to renew. (a) The commissioner may refuse to grant or renew, or may suspend or revoke, a license on any of the following grounds: (1) violation of any of the provisions of sections 144.50 to 144.56 or the rules or standards issued pursuant thereto, or Minnesota Rules, chapters 4650 and 4675; (2) permitting, aiding, or abetting the commission of any illegal act in the institution; (3) conduct or practices detrimental to the welfare of the patient; or (4) obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or misrepresentation; or (5) with respect to hospitals and outpatient surgical centers, if the commissioner determines that there is a pattern of conduct that one or more physicians, advanced practice registered nurses, or physician assistants who have a "financial or economic interest," as defined in section 144.6521, subdivision 3, in the hospital or outpatient surgical center, have not provided the notice and disclosure of the financial or economic interest required by section 144.6521. (b) The commissioner shall not renew a license for a boarding care bed in a resident room with more than four beds. (c) The commissioner shall not renew licenses for hospital beds issued to a hospital or hospital corporate system pursuant to a hospital construction moratorium exception under new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, new text end section 144.551, subdivision 1a, if the commissioner determines the hospital or hospital corporate system is not satisfying the conditions on which the exception was granted. Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 144.552; 144.553; and 376.08, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-08162 144.551 HOSPITAL CONSTRUCTION MORATORIUM. Subdivision 1. Restricted construction or modification. (a) The following construction or modification may not be commenced: (1) any erection, building, alteration, reconstruction, modernization, improvement, extension, lease, or other acquisition by or on behalf of a hospital that increases the bed capacity of a hospital, relocates hospital beds from one physical facility, complex, or site to another, or otherwise results in an increase or redistribution of hospital beds within the state; and (2) the establishment of a new hospital. (b) This section does not apply to: (1) construction or relocation within a county by a hospital, clinic, or other health care facility that is a national referral center engaged in substantial programs of patient care, medical research, and medical education meeting state and national needs that receives more than 40 percent of its patients from outside the state of Minnesota; (2) a project for construction or modification for which a health care facility held an approved certificate of need on May 1, 1984, regardless of the date of expiration of the certificate; (3) a project for which a certificate of need was denied before July 1, 1990, if a timely appeal results in an order reversing the denial; (4) a project exempted from certificate of need requirements by Laws 1981, chapter 200, section 2; (5) a project involving consolidation of pediatric specialty hospital services within the Minneapolis-St. Paul metropolitan area that would not result in a net increase in the number of pediatric specialty hospital beds among the hospitals being consolidated; (6) a project involving the temporary relocation of pediatric-orthopedic hospital beds to an existing licensed hospital that will allow for the reconstruction of a new philanthropic, pediatric-orthopedic hospital on an existing site and that will not result in a net increase in the number of hospital beds. Upon completion of the reconstruction, the licenses of both hospitals must be reinstated at the capacity that existed on each site before the relocation; (7) the relocation or redistribution of hospital beds within a hospital building or identifiable complex of buildings provided the relocation or redistribution does not result in: (i) an increase in the overall bed capacity at that site; (ii) relocation of hospital beds from one physical site or complex to another; or (iii) redistribution of hospital beds within the state or a region of the state; (8) relocation or redistribution of hospital beds within a hospital corporate system that involves the transfer of beds from a closed facility site or complex to an existing site or complex provided that: (i) no more than 50 percent of the capacity of the closed facility is transferred; (ii) the capacity of the site or complex to which the beds are transferred does not increase by more than 50 percent; (iii) the beds are not transferred outside of a federal health systems agency boundary in place on July 1, 1983; (iv) the relocation or redistribution does not involve the construction of a new hospital building; and (v) the transferred beds are used first to replace within the hospital corporate system the total number of beds previously used in the closed facility site or complex for mental health services and substance use disorder services. Only after the hospital corporate system has fulfilled the requirements of this item may the remainder of the available capacity of the closed facility site or complex be transferred for any other purpose; (9) a construction project involving up to 35 new beds in a psychiatric hospital in Rice County that primarily serves adolescents and that receives more than 70 percent of its patients from outside the state of Minnesota; (10) a project to replace a hospital or hospitals with a combined licensed capacity of 130 beds or less if: (i) the new hospital site is located within five miles of the current site; and (ii) the total licensed capacity of the replacement hospital, either at the time of construction of the initial building or as the result of future expansion, will not exceed 100 licensed hospital beds, or the combined licensed capacity of the hospitals, whichever is less; (11) the relocation of licensed hospital beds from an existing state facility operated by the Direct Care and Treatment executive board to a new or existing facility, building, or complex operated by the Direct Care and Treatment executive board; from one regional treatment center site to another; or from one building or site to a new or existing building or site on the same campus; (12) the construction or relocation of hospital beds operated by a hospital having a statutory obligation to provide hospital and medical services for the indigent that does not result in a net increase in the number of hospital beds, notwithstanding section 144.552, 27 beds, of which 12 serve mental health needs, may be transferred from Hennepin County Medical Center to Regions Hospital under this clause; (13) a construction project involving the addition of up to 31 new beds in an existing nonfederal hospital in Beltrami County; (14) a construction project involving the addition of up to eight new beds in an existing nonfederal hospital in Otter Tail County with 100 licensed acute care beds; (15) a construction project involving the addition of 20 new hospital beds in an existing hospital in Carver County serving the southwest suburban metropolitan area; (16) a project for the construction or relocation of up to 20 hospital beds for the operation of up to two psychiatric facilities or units for children provided that the operation of the facilities or units have received the approval of the commissioner of human services; (17) a project involving the addition of 14 new hospital beds to be used for rehabilitation services in an existing hospital in Itasca County; (18) a project to add 20 licensed beds in existing space at a hospital in Hennepin County that closed 20 rehabilitation beds in 2002, provided that the beds are used only for rehabilitation in the hospital's current rehabilitation building. If the beds are used for another purpose or moved to another location, the hospital's licensed capacity is reduced by 20 beds; (19) a critical access hospital established under section 144.1483, clause (9), and section 1820 of the federal Social Security Act, United States Code, title 42, section 1395i-4, that delicensed beds since enactment of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997, Public Law 105-33, to the extent that the critical access hospital does not seek to exceed the maximum number of beds permitted such hospital under federal law; (20) notwithstanding section 144.552, a project for the construction of a new hospital in the city of Maple Grove with a licensed capacity of up to 300 beds provided that: (i) the project, including each hospital or health system that will own or control the entity that will hold the new hospital license, is approved by a resolution of the Maple Grove City Council as of March 1, 2006; (ii) the entity that will hold the new hospital license will be owned or controlled by one or more not-for-profit hospitals or health systems that have previously submitted a plan or plans for a project in Maple Grove as required under section 144.552, and the plan or plans have been found to be in the public interest by the commissioner of health as of April 1, 2005; (iii) the new hospital's initial inpatient services must include, but are not limited to, medical and surgical services, obstetrical and gynecological services, intensive care services, orthopedic services, pediatric services, noninvasive cardiac diagnostics, behavioral health services, and emergency room services; (iv) the new hospital: (A) will have the ability to provide and staff sufficient new beds to meet the growing needs of the Maple Grove service area and the surrounding communities currently being served by the hospital or health system that will own or control the entity that will hold the new hospital license; (B) will provide uncompensated care; (C) will provide mental health services, including inpatient beds; (D) will be a site for workforce development for a broad spectrum of health-care-related occupations and have a commitment to providing clinical training programs for physicians and other health care providers; (E) will demonstrate a commitment to quality care and patient safety; (F) will have an electronic medical records system, including physician order entry; (G) will provide a broad range of senior services; (H) will provide emergency medical services that will coordinate care with regional providers of trauma services and licensed emergency ambulance services in order to enhance the continuity of care for emergency medical patients; and (I) will be completed by December 31, 2009, unless delayed by circumstances beyond the control of the entity holding the new hospital license; and (v) as of 30 days following submission of a written plan, the commissioner of health has not determined that the hospitals or health systems that will own or control the entity that will hold the new hospital license are unable to meet the criteria of this clause; (21) a project approved under section 144.553; (22) a project for the construction of a hospital with up to 25 beds in Cass County within a 20-mile radius of the state Ah-Gwah-Ching facility, provided the hospital's license holder is approved by the Cass County Board; (23) a project for an acute care hospital in Fergus Falls that will increase the bed capacity from 108 to 110 beds by increasing the rehabilitation bed capacity from 14 to 16 and closing a separately licensed 13-bed skilled nursing facility; (24) notwithstanding section 144.552, a project for the construction and expansion of a specialty psychiatric hospital in Hennepin County for up to 50 beds, exclusively for patients who are under 21 years of age on the date of admission. The commissioner conducted a public interest review of the mental health needs of Minnesota and the Twin Cities metropolitan area in 2008. No further public interest review shall be conducted for the construction or expansion project under this clause; (25) a project for a 16-bed psychiatric hospital in the city of Thief River Falls, if the commissioner finds the project is in the public interest after the public interest review conducted under section 144.552 is complete; (26)(i) a project for a 20-bed psychiatric hospital, within an existing facility in the city of Maple Grove, exclusively for patients who are under 21 years of age on the date of admission, if the commissioner finds the project is in the public interest after the public interest review conducted under section 144.552 is complete; (ii) this project shall serve patients in the continuing care benefit program under section 256.9693. The project may also serve patients not in the continuing care benefit program; and (iii) if the project ceases to participate in the continuing care benefit program, the commissioner must complete a subsequent public interest review under section 144.552. If the project is found not to be in the public interest, the license must be terminated six months from the date of that finding. If the commissioner of human services terminates the contract without cause or reduces per diem payment rates for patients under the continuing care benefit program below the rates in effect for services provided on December 31, 2015, the project may cease to participate in the continuing care benefit program and continue to operate without a subsequent public interest review; (27) a project involving the addition of 21 new beds in an existing psychiatric hospital in Hennepin County that is exclusively for patients who are under 21 years of age on the date of admission; (28) a project to add 55 licensed beds in an existing safety net, level I trauma center hospital in Ramsey County as designated under section 383A.91, subdivision 5, of which 15 beds are to be used for inpatient mental health and 40 are to be used for other services. In addition, five unlicensed observation mental health beds shall be added; (29) upon submission of a plan to the commissioner for public interest review under section 144.552 and the addition of the 15 inpatient mental health beds specified in clause (28), to its bed capacity, a project to add 45 licensed beds in an existing safety net, level I trauma center hospital in Ramsey County as designated under section 383A.91, subdivision 5. Five of the 45 additional beds authorized under this clause must be designated for use for inpatient mental health and must be added to the hospital's bed capacity before the remaining 40 beds are added. Notwithstanding section 144.552, the hospital may add licensed beds under this clause prior to completion of the public interest review, provided the hospital submits its plan by the 2021 deadline and adheres to the timelines for the public interest review described in section 144.552; (30) upon submission of a plan to the commissioner for public interest review under section 144.552, a project to add up to 30 licensed beds in an existing psychiatric hospital in Hennepin County that exclusively provides care to patients who are under 21 years of age on the date of admission. Notwithstanding section 144.552, the psychiatric hospital may add licensed beds under this clause prior to completion of the public interest review, provided the hospital submits its plan by the 2021 deadline and adheres to the timelines for the public interest review described in section 144.552; (31) any project to add licensed beds in a hospital located in Cook County or Mahnomen County that: (i) is designated as a critical access hospital under section 144.1483, clause (9), and United States Code, title 42, section 1395i-4; (ii) has a licensed bed capacity of fewer than 25 beds; and (iii) has an attached nursing home, so long as the total number of licensed beds in the hospital after the bed addition does not exceed 25 beds. Notwithstanding section 144.552, a public interest review is not required for a project authorized under this clause; (32) upon submission of a plan to the commissioner for public interest review under section 144.552, a project to add 22 licensed beds at a Minnesota freestanding children's hospital in St. Paul that is part of an independent pediatric health system with freestanding inpatient hospitals located in Minneapolis and St. Paul. The beds shall be utilized for pediatric inpatient behavioral health services. Notwithstanding section 144.552, the hospital may add licensed beds under this clause prior to completion of the public interest review, provided the hospital submits its plan by the 2022 deadline and adheres to the timelines for the public interest review described in section 144.552; (33) a project for a 144-bed psychiatric hospital on the site of the former Bethesda hospital in the city of Saint Paul, Ramsey County, if the commissioner finds the project is in the public interest after the public interest review conducted under section 144.552 is complete. Following the completion of the construction project, the commissioner of health shall monitor the hospital, including by assessing the hospital's case mix and payer mix, patient transfers, and patient diversions. The hospital must have an intake and assessment area. The hospital must accommodate patients with acute mental health needs, whether they walk up to the facility, are delivered by ambulances or law enforcement, or are transferred from other facilities. The hospital must comply with subdivision 1a, paragraph (b). The hospital must annually submit de-identified data to the department in the format and manner defined by the commissioner; or (34) a project involving the relocation of up to 26 licensed long-term acute care hospital beds from an existing long-term care hospital located in Hennepin County with a licensed capacity prior to the relocation of 92 beds to dedicated space on the campus of an existing safety net, level I trauma center hospital in Ramsey County as designated under section 383A.91, subdivision 5, provided both the commissioner finds the project is in the public interest after the public interest review conducted under section 144.552 is complete and the relocated beds continue to be used as long-term acute care hospital beds after the relocation. Subd. 1a. Exception for increased mental health bed capacity. (a) From August 1, 2022, to July 31, 2027, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), and sections 144.552 and 144.553, do not apply to: (1) those portions of any erection, building, alteration, reconstruction, modernization, improvement, extension, lease, or other acquisition by or on behalf of a hospital that increase the mental health bed capacity of a hospital; or (2) the establishment of a new psychiatric hospital. (b) Any hospital that increases its bed capacity or is established under this subdivision must: (1) use all the newly licensed beds exclusively for mental health services; (2) accept medical assistance and MinnesotaCare enrollees; (3) abide by the terms of the Minnesota Attorney General Hospital Agreement; (4) have an arrangement with a tertiary care facility or a sufficient number of medical specialists to determine and arrange appropriate treatment of medical conditions; and (5) submit to the commissioner requested information the commissioner deems necessary for the commissioner to conduct the study of inpatient mental health access and quality described in paragraph (e). (c) The commissioner shall monitor the implementation of exceptions under this subdivision. Each hospital or hospital corporate system granted an exception under this subdivision shall submit to the commissioner each year a report on how the hospital or hospital corporate system continues to satisfy the conditions on which the exception was granted. (d) Any hospital found to be in violation of this subdivision is subject to sanction under section 144.55, subdivision 6, paragraph (c). (e) By January 15, 2027, the commissioner of health shall submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over health a report containing the result of a study of inpatient mental health access and quality. The report must contain: (1) the location of every hospital that has expanded its capacity or been established under this subdivision; (2) summary data by location of the patient population served in the newly licensed beds, including age, duration of stay, and county of residence; and (3) an analysis of the change in access and quality of inpatient mental health care in Minnesota resulting from the enactment of this subdivision. A hospital that expands its capacity or is established under this subdivision must provide the information and data the commissioner requests to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph. For the purposes of section 144.55, subdivision 6, paragraph (c), a hospital's failure to provide data requested by the commissioner is a failure to satisfy the conditions on which an exception is granted under this subdivision. (f) The commissioner may request from other hospitals information that the commissioner deems necessary to perform the analysis required under paragraph (e). (g) No psychiatric hospital may be established on the site of the former Bethesda hospital in Saint Paul, Ramsey County, unless the commissioner determines that establishment of the hospital is in the public interest after completing a public interest review under section 144.552. Subd. 2. Emergency waiver. The commissioner shall grant an emergency waiver from the provisions of this section if the need for the project is a result of fire, tornado, flood, storm damage, or other similar disaster, if adequate health care facilities are not available for the people who previously used the applicant facility, and if the request for an emergency waiver is limited in nature and scope only to those repairs necessitated by the natural disaster. Subd. 3. Enforcement. The district court in Ramsey County has jurisdiction to enjoin an alleged violation of subdivision 1. At the request of the commissioner of health, the attorney general may bring an action to enjoin an alleged violation. The commissioner of health shall not issue a license for any portion of a hospital in violation of subdivision 1. No hospital in violation of subdivision 1 may apply for or receive public funds under chapters 245 to 256B, or from any other source. Subd. 4. Definitions. Except as indicated in this subdivision, the terms used in this section have the meanings given them under Minnesota Statutes 1982, sections 145.832 to 145.845, and the rules adopted under those sections. The term "hospital" has the meaning given it in section 144.50. 144.552 PUBLIC INTEREST REVIEW. (a) The following entities must submit a plan to the commissioner: (1) a hospital seeking to increase its number of licensed beds; or (2) an organization seeking to obtain a hospital license and notified by the commissioner under section 144.553, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), that it is subject to this section. The plan must include information that includes an explanation of how the expansion will meet the public's interest. When submitting a plan to the commissioner, an applicant shall pay the commissioner for the commissioner's cost of reviewing and monitoring the plan, as determined by the commissioner and notwithstanding section 16A.1283. Money received by the commissioner under this section is appropriated to the commissioner for the purpose of administering this section. If the commissioner does not issue a finding within the time limit specified in paragraph (c), the commissioner must return to the applicant the entire amount the applicant paid to the commissioner. For a hospital that is seeking an exception to the moratorium under section 144.551, the plan must be submitted to the commissioner no later than August 1 of the calendar year prior to the year when the exception will be considered by the legislature. (b) Plans submitted under this section shall include detailed information necessary for the commissioner to review the plan and reach a finding. The commissioner may request additional information from the hospital submitting a plan under this section and from others affected by the plan that the commissioner deems necessary to review the plan and make a finding. If the commissioner determines that additional information is required from the hospital submitting a plan under this section, the commissioner shall notify the hospital of the additional information required no more than 30 days after the initial submission of the plan. A hospital submitting a plan from whom the commissioner has requested additional information shall submit the requested additional information within 14 calendar days of the commissioner's request. (c) The commissioner shall review the plan and, within 150 calendar days of the date when the commissioner sends the applicant organization a notice of complete application letter, issue a finding on whether the plan is in the public interest. The commissioner shall provide a copy of the notice of complete application letter to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees with jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance. In making the recommendation, the commissioner shall consider issues including but not limited to: (1) whether the new hospital or hospital beds are needed to provide timely access to care or access to new or improved services given the number of available beds. For the purposes of this clause, "available beds" means the number of licensed acute care beds that are immediately available for use or could be brought online within 48 hours without significant facility modifications; (2) the financial impact of the new hospital or hospital beds on existing acute-care hospitals that have emergency departments in the region; (3) how the new hospital or hospital beds will affect the ability of existing hospitals in the region to maintain existing staff; (4) the extent to which the new hospital or hospital beds will provide services to nonpaying or low-income patients relative to the level of services provided to these groups by existing hospitals in the region; and (5) the views of affected parties. (d) If the plan is being submitted by an existing hospital seeking authority to construct a new hospital, the commissioner shall also consider: (1) the ability of the applicant to maintain the applicant's current level of community benefit as defined in section 144.699, subdivision 5, at the existing facility; and (2) the impact on the workforce at the existing facility including the applicant's plan for: (i) transitioning current workers to the new facility; (ii) retraining and employment security for current workers; and (iii) addressing the impact of layoffs at the existing facility on affected workers. (e) If the commissioner receives multiple plan submissions under this section within the same review period, the commissioner shall review the plans in the order they were received. Time periods under this section shall begin for each review once the commissioner has sent the applicant organization a notice of complete application letter. The commissioner shall provide to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees having jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance updates every 30 days on the progress of the review of any plan submitted under this section. (f) Prior to making a recommendation, the commissioner shall conduct a public hearing in the affected hospital service area to take testimony from interested persons. (g) Upon making a recommendation under paragraph (c), the commissioner shall provide a copy of the recommendation to the chairs of the house of representatives and senate committees having jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance. (h) If an exception to the moratorium is approved under section 144.551 after a review under this section, the commissioner shall monitor the implementation of the exception up to completion of the construction project. Thirty days after completion of the construction project, the hospital shall submit to the commissioner a report on how the construction has met the provisions of the plan originally submitted under the public interest review process or a plan submitted pursuant to section 144.551, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (20). 144.553 ALTERNATIVE APPROVAL PROCESS. Subdivision 1. Letter of intent; publication; acceptance of additional proposals. (a) An organization seeking to obtain a hospital license must submit a letter of intent to the commissioner, specifying the community in which the proposed hospital would be located and the number of beds proposed for the new hospital. When multiple letters of intent are received, the commissioner shall determine whether they constitute requests for separate projects or are competing proposals to serve the same or a similar service area. (b) Upon receipt of a letter under paragraph (a), the commissioner shall publish a notice in the State Register that includes the information received from the organization under paragraph (a). The notice must state that another organization interested in seeking a hospital license to serve the same or a similar service area must notify the commissioner within 30 days. (c) If no responses are received from additional organizations under paragraph (b), the commissioner shall notify the entity seeking a license that it is required to submit a plan under section 144.552 and shall notify the chairs of the house of representatives and senate committees having jurisdiction over health and human services policy and finance that the project is subject to sections 144.551 and 144.552. Subd. 2. Needs assessment. (a) If one or more responses are received by the commissioner under subdivision 1, paragraph (b), the commissioner shall complete within 90 days a needs assessment to determine if a new hospital is needed in the proposed service area. (b) The organizations that have filed or responded to a letter of intent under subdivision 1 shall provide to the commissioner within 30 days of a request from the commissioner a statement justifying the need for a new hospital in the service area and sufficient information, as determined by the commissioner, to allow the commissioner to determine the need for a new hospital. The information may include, but is not limited to, a demographic analysis of the proposed service area, the number of proposed beds, the types of hospital services to be provided, and distances and travel times to existing hospitals currently providing services in the service area. (c) The commissioner shall make a determination of need for the new hospital. If the commissioner determines that a new hospital in the service area is not justified, the commissioner shall notify the applicants in writing, stating the reasons for the decision. Subd. 3. Process when hospital need is determined. (a) If the commissioner determines that a new hospital is needed in the proposed service area, the commissioner shall notify the applicants of that finding and shall select the applicant determined under the process established in this subdivision to be best able to provide services consistent with the review criteria established in this subdivision. (b) The commissioner shall: (1) determine market-specific criteria that shall be used to evaluate all proposals. The criteria must include standards regarding: (i) access to care; (ii) quality of care; (iii) cost of care; and (iv) overall project feasibility; (2) establish additional criteria at the commissioner's discretion. In establishing the criteria, the commissioner shall consider the need for: (i) mental health services in the service area, including both inpatient and outpatient services for adults, adolescents, and children; (ii) a significant commitment to providing uncompensated care, including discounts for uninsured patients and coordination with other providers of care to low-income uninsured persons; and (iii) coordination with other hospitals so that specialized services are not unnecessarily duplicated and are provided in sufficient volume to ensure the maintenance of high-quality care; and (3) define a service area for the proposed hospital. The service area shall consist of: (i) in the 11-county metropolitan area, in St. Cloud, and in Duluth, the zip codes located within a 20-mile radius of the proposed new hospital location; and (ii) in the remainder of the state, the zip codes within a 30-mile radius of the proposed new hospital location. (c) If the plan is being submitted by an existing hospital, the commissioner shall also consider: (1) the ability of the applicant to maintain the applicant's current level of community benefit as defined in section 144.699, subdivision 5, at the existing facility; and (2) the impact on the workforce at the existing facility including the applicant's plan for: (i) transitioning current workers to the new facility; (ii) retraining and employment security for current workers; and (iii) addressing the impact of layoffs at the existing facility on affected workers. (d) The commissioner shall publish the criteria determined under paragraphs (b) and (c) in the State Register within 60 days of the determination under subdivision 2. Once published, the criteria shall not be modified with respect to the particular project and applicants to which they apply. The commissioner shall publish with the criteria guidelines for a proposal and submission review process. (e) For 60 days after the publication under paragraph (d), the commissioner shall accept proposals to construct a hospital from organizations that have submitted a letter of intent under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), or have notified the commissioner under subdivision 1, paragraph (b). The proposal must include a plan for the new hospital and evidence of compliance with the criteria specified under paragraphs (b) and (c). Once submitted, the proposal may not be revised except: (1) to submit corrections of material facts; or (2) in response to a request from the commissioner to provide clarification or further information. (f) The commissioner shall determine within 90 days of the deadline for applications under paragraph (e), which applicant has demonstrated that it is best able to provide services consistent with the published criteria. The commissioner shall make this determination by order following a hearing according to this paragraph. The hearing shall not constitute or be considered to be a contested case hearing under chapter 14 and shall be conducted solely under the procedures specified in this paragraph. The hearing shall commence upon at least 30 days' notice to the applicants by the commissioner. The hearing may be conducted by the commissioner or by a person designated by the commissioner. The designee may be an administrative law judge. The purpose of the hearing shall be to receive evidence to assist the commissioner in determining which applicant has demonstrated that it best meets the published criteria. The parties to the hearing shall consist only of those applicants who have submitted a completed application. Each applicant shall have the right to be represented by counsel, to present evidence deemed relevant by the commissioner, and to examine and cross-examine witnesses. Persons who are not parties to the proceeding but who wish to present comments or submit information may do so in the manner determined by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee. Any person who is not a party shall have no right to examine or cross-examine witnesses. The commissioner may participate as an active finder of fact in the hearing and may ask questions to elicit information or clarify answers or responses. (g) Prior to making a determination selecting an application, the commissioner shall hold a public hearing in the proposed hospital service area to accept comments from members of the public. The commissioner shall take this information into consideration in making the determination. The commissioner shall appoint an advisory committee, including legislators and local elected officials who represent the service area and outside experts to assist in the recommendation process. The legislative appointees shall include, at a minimum, the chairs of the senate and house of representatives committees with jurisdiction over health care policy. The commissioner shall issue an order selecting an application following the closing of the record of the hearing as determined by the hearing officer. The commissioner's order shall include a statement of the reasons the selected application best meets the published criteria. (h) Within 30 days following the determination under paragraph (f), the commissioner shall recommend the selected proposal to the legislature. (i) If an exception to the moratorium is approved under section 144.551 after a review under this section, the commissioner shall monitor the implementation of the exception up to completion of the construction project. Thirty days after completion of the construction project, the hospital shall submit to the commissioner a report on how the construction has met the provisions of the plan originally submitted under the public interest review process or a plan submitted pursuant to section 144.551, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (20). Subd. 4. Payment of commissioner's expenses. Notwithstanding section 16A.1283, applicants who are a party at any stage of the administrative process established in this section shall pay the cost of that stage of the process, as determined by the commissioner. The cost of the needs assessment, criteria development, and hearing shall be divided equally among the applicants. Money received by the commissioner under this subdivision is appropriated to the commissioner for the purpose of administering this section. 376.08 COUNTIES OF NOT MORE THAN 50,000; HOSPITALS AND MUNICIPALLY OWNED NURSING HOMES. Subd. 3. Limitation on hospital capacity. Section 144.551 applies to any project authorized by subdivision 2. Subdivision 2 does not authorize an increase in the license capacity of the hospital or the licensing, relocation, or redistribution of hospital beds except as provided by section 144.551, subdivision 1, paragraph (b).